California, session 20252026, AB1875.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2339 of the Family Code is amended to read:2339. (a) Subject to subdivision (b) and to Sections 2340 to 2344, inclusive, no judgment of dissolution is final for the purpose of terminating the marriage relationship of the parties until six months have expired from the date of service of a copy of summons and petition or the date of appearance of the respondent, whichever occurs first.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the court may extend, reduce, or waive the six-month period described in subdivision (a) for good cause shown. shown, provided that the parties have resolved all material issues related to the dissolution, and either of the following:(1) The court has conducted a notice hearing to determine good cause.(2) Both parties have stipulated that good cause exists, and the court finds good cause.(c) For purposes of this subdivision, good cause includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(1) The court finds that the petitioning party is the victim of domestic violence during the marriage and the petitioning party requests a waiver or reduction for their health, safety, and well-being.(2) The parties have signed and filed a marital settlement agreement resolving all material issues related to the dissolution.(3) One party seeks to remarry and a waiver or reduction will not affect any issues material to the dissolution bifurcated by the court, pursuant to Section 2337.SEC. 2. Section 2403 of the Family Code is amended to read:2403. (a) When six months have expired from the date of the filing of the joint petition for summary dissolution, the court shall, unless a revocation has been filed pursuant to Section 2402, enter the judgment dissolving the marriage. The judgment restores to the parties the status of single persons, and either party may marry after the entry of the judgment. The clerk shall send a notice of entry of judgment to each of the parties at the party’s last known address.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the court may reduce or waive the six-month period described in subdivision (a) for good cause shown.